Washington statutes.
RCW 17.04.260

Limit of indebtedness.

No weed district shall contract any obligation in any year in excess of the total of the funds which will be available during the current year from the tax levy made in the preceding year and funds received in the current year from services rendered and from any other lawful source, and funds accumulated from previous years.

[ 1963 c 52 s 1; 1961 c 250 s 9; 1957 c 13 s 4. Prior: 1929 c 125 s 5, part; 1921 c 150 s 8; RRS s 2778.]